Wyoming, session 2026, SF0099.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The legislature finds that:
(i) During the electrification of rural Wyoming,
it was common for multiple landowners to allow the
construction of electrical distribution lines across their
properties for the purpose of distributing electricity to
the area residents. Each landowner benefitted from the
permissions given by other landowners. The electrical
providers relied on neighborly cooperation and the
permissions granted by the various landowners to build and
maintain electrical distribution lines that benefitted all
the affected landowners;
(ii) In many cases, these arrangements were not
supported with written documentation;
(iii) These historic arrangements and
permissions were in the public interest and warrant legal
protection;
(iv) It is not in the public interest to
penalize neighborly cooperation by expanding the scope of
the easement or burden on the land beyond the intent of the
parties who entered into these agreements.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0099
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. W.S. 34-1-159 is created to read:
34-1-159. Prescriptive easements for electricity
delivery and distribution.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Delivery" means the distribution or
transmission of electricity;
(ii) "Electric utility" means as defined by W.S.
37-3-401(a)(ii);
(iii) "Electricity user" means a person, or the
person's predecessor, that receives or received electricity
from a public utility, that is or was a member or customer
of a public utility or whose land is crossed by an electric
utility's system;
(iv) "Public utility" means as defined by W.S.
37-1-101(a)(vi);
(v) "System" means the physical structures,
including overhead power lines and appurtenant structures,
that convey electricity from a public utility to an
electricity user.
(b) An electric utility shall be granted a
nonexclusive easement under this section for a system, and
the ability to reattach any existing pole attachments, if:
(i) The electric utility has installed a
delivery system;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0099
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) The delivery system, or a portion of the
system, is visibly installed so as to provide any
successors-in-interest to the electricity user constructive
notice or actual notice that the delivery system exists on
the property;
(iii) The delivery system was installed on the
property on or before January 1, 2006;
(iv) The delivery system's use is continuous and
uninterrupted. A change of use, cessation of use or
de-energization for a period not exceeding one (1) year
shall not be deemed an interruption for purposes of this
paragraph; and
(v) There is no valid existing written agreement
between the electric utility and the landowner establishing
any other easement regarding the delivery system or a
portion of the delivery system.
(c) Upon the establishment of an easement under this
section:
(i) The electric utility shall have the right to
reconstruct, re-phase, maintain and repair the existing
system and the right to trim and remove trees and other
vegetation that is hazardous or that is reasonably likely
to become hazardous to the delivery system;
(ii) Access to the easement and ingress and
egress shall be limited to the easement to the extent
necessary to permit the reasonable enjoyment of the rights
and privileges granted by this section unless access or
ingress and egress to parts of the easement would be
hazardous to or materially encumbered for the electric
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0099
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
utility. If access or ingress or egress to parts of the
easement would be hazardous or materially encumbered, the
easement granted under this section may include other
reasonable access that minimizes impacts on the landowner
to the extent reasonably possible.
(d) The width of an easement granted under this
section shall be consistent with the historical and
traditional use by the electric utility of the delivery
system but shall not exceed thirty (30) feet in any
direction from the location of the existing line or other
physical components of the system.
(e) An easement created under this section shall be
deemed abandoned if the electric utility fails to use the
delivery system for greater than three (3) consecutive
years without an agreement with the landowner or the
landowner's predecessor allowing the lack of use.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(i) Interfere with, impair, modify or alter any
rights or duties established by any existing easement or
other agreement, including an easement for electricity
delivery established by written instrument or other law;
(ii) Expand the electric utility's use of the
easement beyond adjustments consistent with historic uses
or normal development of the dominant and servient estate
in a way that would materially increase the burden of the
servient estate, except when needed to serve a reasonable
expansion of use for neighboring or local land uses. Such
exception shall not include industrial and manufacturing
related increases in wattage;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0099
ENROLLED ACT NO. 63, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Expand or modify the prescriptive easement
laws of this state.
(g) Before an electric utility is granted a
nonexclusive easement under this section, the electric
utility shall publish a notice prior to the easement's
enactment date in a local newspaper or customer newsletter.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5